Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.50.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Health care facility" means a facility that provides health care services directly to patients, including but not limited to, a hospital, clinic, health care provider's office, health maintenance organization, diagnostic or treatment center, neuropsychiatric or mental health facility, hospice, or nursing home.

(2) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 7.70.020 (1) and (2), and also means an officer, director, employee, or agent of a health care facility who sues or testifies regarding matters within the scope of his or her employment.

(3) "Aggrieved" means:

(a) A person, physically present at the health care facility when the prohibited actions occur, whose access is or is about to be obstructed or impeded;

(b) A person, physically present at the health care facility when the prohibited actions occur, whose care is or is about to be disrupted;

(c) The health care facility, its employees, or agents;

(d) The owner of the health care facility or the building or property upon which the health care facility is located.

[ 1993 c 128 s 2.]